Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1311.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 33-276, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE33-276. Applicability A. This article applies to any interest created after its effective date which August 7, 1985 that complies with this article, whether designated as a conservation easement or as a covenant, equitable servitude, restriction, easement or otherwise. B. This article does not invalidate any interest, whether designated as a conservation or preservation easement or as a covenant, equitable servitude, restriction, easement or otherwise, that is enforceable under any other law of this state. END_STATUTE